District of Columbia statutes.
8-1778.44

Duties of administrator.

The administrator shall provide general management, oversight, and coordination of the Energy Efficiency Loan program and its related services, including performing the following duties:

(1)

Outreach and marketing to eligible property owners to inform them of the existence and benefits of the Energy Efficiency Loan program in conjunction with the brand name established pursuant to § 8-1774.06;

(2)

Establishing loan and credit standards and processes;

(3)

Underwriting and servicing all Energy Efficiency Loan applications;

(4)

Identifying market opportunities and funding leverage opportunities;

(5)

Collecting appropriate documents and recording the tax liens;

(6)

Sending sufficient information to the Office of Tax and Revenue to enable the Office of Tax and Revenue to collect the Special Assessments, including the allocations of Debt Service and administrative costs;

(7)

Evaluating, retaining, and overseeing firms to perform energy audits, (including maintaining a list of approved auditors for use by property owners), energy benchmarking, and energy savings verification;

(8)

Implementing the Quality Assurance Program;

(9)

Certifying and pre-qualifying all contractors authorized to provide Energy Efficiency Improvements or other work under this chapter;

(10)

Approving forms and quality standards to perform installation of Energy Efficiency Improvements;

(11)

Maintaining a list of pre-qualified contractors authorized to provide Energy Efficiency Improvements under this chapter; and

(12)

Reporting to the Mayor and the Council on the progress of the Energy Efficiency Loan program.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-183, § 304, 57 DCR 3406
Section 205 of D.C. Law 18-156 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 205. Duties of administrator.
“The administrator shall provide general management, oversight, and coordination of the energy efficiency loan program and its related services, including performing the following duties:
“(1) Outreach and marketing to eligible property owners to inform them of the existence and benefits of the energy efficiency loan program in conjunction with the brand established pursuant to section 206 of the Clean and Affordable Energy Act of 2008, effective October 22, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-250; D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.06);
“(2) Establishing loan and credit standards and processes;
“(3) Underwriting and servicing all energy efficiency loan applications;
“(4) Identifying market opportunities and funding leverage opportunities;
“(5) Collecting appropriate documents and recording the tax liens;
“(6) Sending sufficient information to the Office of Tax and Revenue to enable the Office of Tax and Revenue to collect the Special Assessments, including the allocations of Debt Service and administrative costs;
“(7) Evaluating, retaining, and overseeing firms to perform energy audits, (including providing a list of approved auditors for use by property owners), energy benchmarking, and energy savings verification;
“(8) Oversee the Quality Assurance Program and energy audits and verify the quality of the outcome;
“(9) Certify and pre-qualify all contractors performing work within the loan program and authorized to provide energy conservation and retrofit services financed under this act; and
“(10) Maintain a list of pre-qualified contractors authorized to provide energy conservation services under this act.”
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 18-156 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 205 of Energy Efficiency Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-324, March 1, 2010, 57 DCR 1851).